Nevada, session 83, AB473.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Records, Communications and Compliance
Division of the Department of Public Safety the sum of $500,000
for carrying out a forensic DNA testing program.
2. Money appropriated by subsection 1 may be:
(a) Granted to a forensic laboratory designated by a board of
county commissioners to carry out the program.
(b) Used only:
(1) To conduct genetic marker analyses for unidentified
deceased persons; and
(2) If the DNA profile resulting from the genetic marker
analysis fails to yield a match in CODIS, for forensic genetic
genealogy DNA testing.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
-
*AB473*

– 2 –
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Biological specimen” means a biological sample, tissue,
fluid or other bodily sample suitable for genetic marker analysis,
obtained from a person.
(b) “CODIS” means the Federal Bureau of Investigation’s
Combined DNA Index System that allows for the storage and
exchange of DNA records submitted by federal, state and local
forensic DNA laboratories.
(c) “DNA” means deoxyribonucleic acid, which is located in the
cells of a person and which provides the genetic blueprint of a
person.
(d) “DNA profile” means the genetic constitution of a person at
defined locations in the DNA of the person.
(e) “Forensic genetic genealogy DNA testing” means any testing
performed in a forensic laboratory capable of producing a forensic
genealogy profile with a minimum of 100,000 genetic markers and
compatible with multiple genealogical databases consented for law
enforcement use and includes associated genealogical research.
(f) “Genetic marker analysis” means the analytical testing
process of a biological specimen that results in a DNA profile.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB473*